Washington statutes.
RCW 11.11.100

Authority to withhold transfer—Notice—Expenses of obtaining consent, authorization, direction.

(1) This chapter does not require any financial institution or other third party to transfer a nonprobate asset to a beneficiary, testamentary beneficiary, or other person claiming an interest in the nonprobate asset if the financial institution or third party has actual knowledge of the existence of a dispute between beneficiaries, testamentary beneficiaries, or other persons concerning rights or ownership to the nonprobate asset under this chapter, or if the financial institution or third party is otherwise uncertain as to who is entitled to receive the nonprobate asset under this chapter. In any such case, the financial institution or third party may, without liability, notify in writing all beneficiaries, testamentary beneficiaries, or other persons claiming an interest in the nonprobate asset of either its uncertainty as to who is entitled to transfer of the nonprobate asset or the existence of any dispute, and it may also, without liability, refuse to transfer a nonprobate asset to a beneficiary or a testamentary beneficiary until such time as either:

(a) All the beneficiaries, testamentary beneficiaries, and other interested persons have consented in writing to the transfer; or

(b) The transfer is authorized or directed by a court of proper jurisdiction.

(2) The expense of obtaining the written consent or court authorization or direction may, by order of the court, be paid by the personal representative as an expense of administration.

[ 1998 c 292 s 114.]